Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-129 Penalty. (a) The
commissioner may revoke or suspend the certificate of an approved course
provider for any violation of the insurance code, subject to the right of the
provider to a hearing as provided in section 431:2-308.

(b) The commissioner shall sanction the license
of any licensee who has submitted an invalid, false, or fraudulent certificate
of completion, subject to the right of a licensee to have a hearing as provided
in chapter 91.

(c) The commissioner shall revoke the approval
of an approved course provider who has issued a certificate of completion to a
licensee who has not attended the continuing education course or to a licensee
who has not met the course requirements, subject to the right of an approved
course provider to have a hearing as provided in section 431:2-308. [L 2001, c
216, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §36; am L 2003, c 212, §68]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next